src-fst-affixes-smi-propernouns.lexc.md
+Pl+Nom:%>jit  K ;
:     ACCRA-DC ;
:%>ji   ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG ;
:%>ji   ACCRA-IICASE ;













ACCRA-IICASE ;











































































These sublexica are irrelevant for SIJTE, but added
for the sake of the lexicon MARJA ! Muhto gč. dat kommentára... Imaštallan dan gal veha...
Here, we allow for Illative Sijtei


These sublexica are irrelevant for SIJTE, but added
for the sake of the lexicon MARJA ! Muhto gč. dat kommentára... Imaštallan dan gal veha...















































































For Finnish names with ending -nen. Kaustinen.

































































Different lexicon for female persons and place names.


Different lexicon for personal surnames. Blind






























































































































As aleuhtat, but with a marginal leakage
to sg forms in some cases. (substandard?)



























































































* LEXICON RHyph  conversion to sms compounding.lexc -type
* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/fst/affixes/smi-propernouns.lexc](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-sms/blob/main/../src/fst/affixes/smi-propernouns.lexc)</small>
